Washington statutes.
RCW 13.50.280

Court and judicial agency records—Use for research or data gathering purposes.

(1) Courts and judicial agencies that maintain a database of juvenile records may provide those records, whether sealed or not, to government agencies for the purpose of carrying out research or data gathering functions. This data may also be linked with records from other agencies or research organizations, provided that any agency receiving or using records under this subsection maintain strict confidentiality of the identity of the juveniles who are the subjects of such records.

(2) Juvenile records, whether sealed or not, can be provided without personal identifiers to researchers conducting legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes, so long as the data is not used by the recipients of the records to identify an individual with a juvenile record.

[ 2015 c 265 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.